Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2033.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-37.8 of the General Laws entitled "Protections for Healthcare
Providers Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-37.8-4. Prescriptive protections for providers of legal protected healthcare activity.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, at the prescriber's
request, the prescription label for medication abortion prescription drugs may include the name of
the prescriber's healthcare practice instead of the name of the prescriber.
(b) For purposes of this section, “medication abortion prescription drugs” means
substances used in the course of medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a
pregnancy including, but not limited to, mifepristone and misoprostol.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003829/SUB A
========